Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-214
School lands; acquisition by school district.

Any school district, in which there may be any educational lands, may acquire for school purposes any portion thereof, not exceeding forty acres.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 11, p. 304;

Laws 1905, c. 144, § 1, p. 582;

Laws 1907, c. 134, § 1, p. 437;

Laws 1913, c. 40, § 1, p. 135;

R.S.1913, § 5855;

Laws 1915, c. 103, § 1, p. 247;

Laws 1921, c. 80, § 2, p. 290;

C.S.1922, § 5191;

Laws 1923, c. 61, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1925, c. 135, § 1, p. 354;

Laws 1929, c. 188, § 1, p. 652;

C.S.1929, § 72-211;

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 573;

R.S.1943, § 72-214.